Massachusetts, session 194th, H5099.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the town of Raynham may grant an additional license for the sale of all
alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138 to
V.B. Gas, Inc. D/B/A Save More Gas and Convenience located at 1348 New State Highway, US-
44 in the town of Raynham. The license shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said
section 17.
(b) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of the license granted under this
section to any other location but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same location
if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a
letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good
standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been
paid.
of 2

(c) If the licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this section or any
such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of
the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority and the
licensing authority may, within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant
at the same location under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license
shall dissolve.
(d) A license granted under this section shall be issued within 1 year after the effective
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (b) and (c) thereafter.
SECTION 2. Upon the issuance of the license authorized in section 1, the licensee shall
return physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the
licensing authority, its license for the sale of wine and malt beverages not to be drunk on the
premises under section 15 of chapter 138.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2